test/src/morphology/myv-test-V-kundams_all_gt-norm.yaml
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1+OcSg3+Foc/Гак: кундылияяк
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2+OcSg3+Foc/Гак: кундыликкак
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg3+Foc/Гак: кундылизеяк
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1+OcPl3+Foc/Гак: кундылиньгак
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2+OcPl3+Foc/Гак: кундылитькак
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl3+Foc/Гак: кундылинзеяк
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1+OcSg3+Foc/Гак: кундылинеккак
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1+OcPl3+Foc/Гак: кундылинеккак
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2+OcSg3+Foc/Гак: кундылинккак
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2+OcPl3+Foc/Гак: кундылинккак
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg3+Foc/Гак: кундылизьгак
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl3+Foc/Гак: кундылизьгак
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1+OcSg2+Foc/Гак: кундылитиньгак
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg2+Foc/Гак: кундылинзетькак
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1+OcPl2+Foc/Гак: кундылидизьгак
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1+OcSg2+Foc/Гак: кундылидизьгак
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1+OcPl2+Foc/Гак: кундылидизьгак
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl2+Foc/Гак: кундылидизьгак
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg2+Foc/Гак: кундылидизьгак
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl2+Foc/Гак: кундылидизьгак
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2+OcSg1+Foc/Гак: кундылимиккак
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg1+Foc/Гак: кундылимимгак
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2+OcPl1+Foc/Гак: кундылимизьгак
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2+OcSg1+Foc/Гак: кундылимизьгак
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2+OcPl1+Foc/Гак: кундылимизьгак
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl1+Foc/Гак: кундылимизьгак
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg1+Foc/Гак: кундылимизьгак
     кундамс+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl1+Foc/Гак: кундылимизьгак
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScSg1+Foc/Гак: кундавлиньгак
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScSg2+Foc/Гак: кундавлитькак
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScSg3+Foc/Гак: кундавольгак
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScPl1+Foc/Гак: кундавлинеккак
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScPl2+Foc/Гак: кундавлидеяк
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScPl3+Foc/Гак: кундавольтькак
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScSg1+OcSg3+Foc/Гак: кундавлияяк
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScSg2+OcSg3+Foc/Гак: кундавликкак
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScSg3+OcSg3+Foc/Гак: кундавлизеяк
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScSg1+OcPl3+Foc/Гак: кундавлиньгак
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScSg2+OcPl3+Foc/Гак: кундавлитькак
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScSg3+OcPl3+Foc/Гак: кундавлинзеяк
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScPl1+OcSg3+Foc/Гак: кундавлинеккак
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScPl1+OcPl3+Foc/Гак: кундавлинеккак
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScPl2+OcSg3+Foc/Гак: кундавлинккак
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScPl2+OcPl3+Foc/Гак: кундавлинккак
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScPl3+OcSg3+Foc/Гак: кундавлизьгак
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl3+Foc/Гак: кундавлизьгак
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScSg1+OcSg2+Foc/Гак: кундавлитиньгак
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScSg3+OcSg2+Foc/Гак: кундавлинзетькак
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScSg1+OcPl2+Foc/Гак: кундавлимизьгак
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScSg2+OcSg1+Foc/Гак: кундавлимизьгак
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScSg3+OcSg1+Foc/Гак: кундавлимизьгак
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScSg2+OcPl1+Foc/Гак: кундавлимизьгак
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScPl2+OcSg1+Foc/Гак: кундавлимизьгак
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScPl2+OcPl1+Foc/Гак: кундавлимизьгак
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScSg3+OcPl1+Foc/Гак: кундавлимизьгак
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScPl3+OcSg1+Foc/Гак: кундавлимизьгак
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl1+Foc/Гак: кундавлимизьгак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg1+Foc/Гак: кундыксэлиньгак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg2+Foc/Гак: кундыксэлитькак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg3+Foc/Гак: кундыксэльгак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl1+Foc/Гак: кундыксэлинеккак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl2+Foc/Гак: кундыксэлидеяк
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl3+Foc/Гак: кундыксэльтькак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg1+OcSg3+Foc/Гак: кундыксэлияяк
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg2+OcSg3+Foc/Гак: кундыксэликкак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg3+Foc/Гак: кундыксэлизеяк
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg1+OcPl3+Foc/Гак: кундыксэлиньгак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg2+OcPl3+Foc/Гак: кундыксэлитькак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl3+Foc/Гак: кундыксэлинзеяк
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl1+OcSg3+Foc/Гак: кундыксэлинеккак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl1+OcPl3+Foc/Гак: кундыксэлинеккак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl2+OcSg3+Foc/Гак: кундыксэлинккак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl2+OcPl3+Foc/Гак: кундыксэлинккак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg3+Foc/Гак: кундыксэлизьгак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl3+Foc/Гак: кундыксэлизьгак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg1+OcSg2+Foc/Гак: кундыксэлитиньгак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg2+Foc/Гак: кундыксэлинзетькак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg1+OcPl2+Foc/Гак: кундыксэлидизьгак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl1+OcSg2+Foc/Гак: кундыксэлидизьгак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl1+OcPl2+Foc/Гак: кундыксэлидизьгак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl2+Foc/Гак: кундыксэлидизьгак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg2+Foc/Гак: кундыксэлидизьгак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl2+Foc/Гак: кундыксэлидизьгак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg2+OcSg1+Foc/Гак: кундыксэлимиккак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg1+Foc/Гак: кундыксэлимимгак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg2+OcPl1+Foc/Гак: кундыксэлимизьгак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl2+OcSg1+Foc/Гак: кундыксэлимизьгак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl2+OcPl1+Foc/Гак: кундыксэлимизьгак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl1+Foc/Гак: кундыксэлимизьгак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg1+Foc/Гак: кундыксэлимизьгак
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl1+Foc/Гак: кундыксэлимизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Der/Омс+Inf+Ill+Foc/Гак: кундындерямскак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScSg1+Foc/Гак: кундындерянгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScSg2+Foc/Гак: кундындеряткак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScSg3+Foc/Гак: кундындеряйгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScPl1+Foc/Гак: кундындерятанояк
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScPl2+Foc/Гак: кундындерятадояк
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScPl3+Foc/Гак: кундындеряйтькак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScSg1+OcSg3+Foc/Гак: кундындерясаяк
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScSg2+OcSg3+Foc/Гак: кундындерясаккак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScSg3+OcSg3+Foc/Гак: кундындерясыяк
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScSg1+OcPl3+Foc/Гак: кундындерясыньгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScSg2+OcPl3+Foc/Гак: кундындерясытькак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScSg3+OcPl3+Foc/Гак: кундындерясынзеяк
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScPl1+OcSg3+Foc/Гак: кундындерясынеккак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScPl1+OcPl3+Foc/Гак: кундындерясынеккак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScPl2+OcSg3+Foc/Гак: кундындерясынккак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScPl2+OcPl3+Foc/Гак: кундындерясынккак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScPl3+OcSg3+Foc/Гак: кундындерясызьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScPl3+OcPl3+Foc/Гак: кундындерясызьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScSg1+OcSg2+Foc/Гак: кундындерятангак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScSg3+OcSg2+Foc/Гак: кундындерятанзаткак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScSg1+OcPl2+Foc/Гак: кундындерятадыдзьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScPl1+OcSg2+Foc/Гак: кундындерятадыдзьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScPl1+OcPl2+Foc/Гак: кундындерятадыдзьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScSg3+OcPl2+Foc/Гак: кундындерятадыдзьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScPl3+OcSg2+Foc/Гак: кундындерятадыдзьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScPl3+OcPl2+Foc/Гак: кундындерятадыдзьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScSg2+OcSg1+Foc/Гак: кундындерясамаккак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScSg3+OcSg1+Foc/Гак: кундындерясамамгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScSg2+OcPl1+Foc/Гак: кундындерясамизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScPl2+OcSg1+Foc/Гак: кундындерясамизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScPl2+OcPl1+Foc/Гак: кундындерясамизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScSg3+OcPl1+Foc/Гак: кундындерясамизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScPl3+OcSg1+Foc/Гак: кундындерясамизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScPl3+OcPl1+Foc/Гак: кундындерясамизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+Foc/Гак: кундындериньгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+Foc/Гак: кундындеритькак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+Foc/Гак: кундындеряськак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+Foc/Гак: кундындеринеккак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+Foc/Гак: кундындеридеяк
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+Foc/Гак: кундындерястькак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcSg3+Foc/Гак: кундындерияяк
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcSg3+Foc/Гак: кундындериккак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg3+Foc/Гак: кундындеризеяк
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcPl3+Foc/Гак: кундындериньгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcPl3+Foc/Гак: кундындеритькак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl3+Foc/Гак: кундындеринзеяк
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcSg3+Foc/Гак: кундындеринеккак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcPl3+Foc/Гак: кундындеринеккак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcSg3+Foc/Гак: кундындеринккак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcPl3+Foc/Гак: кундындеринккак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg3+Foc/Гак: кундындеризьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl3+Foc/Гак: кундындеризьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcSg2+Foc/Гак: кундындеритиньгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg2+Foc/Гак: кундындеринзитькак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcPl2+Foc/Гак: кундындеридизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcSg2+Foc/Гак: кундындеридизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcPl2+Foc/Гак: кундындеридизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl2+Foc/Гак: кундындеридизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg2+Foc/Гак: кундындеридизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl2+Foc/Гак: кундындеридизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcSg1+Foc/Гак: кундындеримиккак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg1+Foc/Гак: кундындеримимгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcPl1+Foc/Гак: кундындеримизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcSg1+Foc/Гак: кундындеримизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcPl1+Foc/Гак: кундындеримизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl1+Foc/Гак: кундындеримизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg1+Foc/Гак: кундындеримизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl1+Foc/Гак: кундындеримизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1+Foc/Гак: кундамскак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2+Foc/Гак: кундамскак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+Foc/Гак: кундамскак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1+Foc/Гак: кундамскак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2+Foc/Гак: кундамскак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+Foc/Гак: кундамскак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1+OcSg3+Foc/Гак: кундындерилияяк
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2+OcSg3+Foc/Гак: кундындериликкак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg3+Foc/Гак: кундындерилизеяк
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1+OcPl3+Foc/Гак: кундындерилиньгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2+OcPl3+Foc/Гак: кундындерилитькак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl3+Foc/Гак: кундындерилинзеяк
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1+OcSg3+Foc/Гак: кундындерилинеккак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1+OcPl3+Foc/Гак: кундындерилинеккак
